Maine, session 132, LD651.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §12004-I, sub-§18-G, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 346, §1, is
repealed.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA c. 441, as amended, is repealed.
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA c. 441-A is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 441-A
MAINE HEALTH CARE PROVIDER LOAN REPAYMENT PROGRAM
§12961. Maine Health Care Provider Loan Repayment Program
1. Program established. The Maine Health Care Provider Loan Repayment Program,
referred to in this section as "the program," is established within the Finance Authority of
Maine for certain health care professionals who commit to living and working in the State
for at least 3 years. The authority may, as funds permit, make loan repayments on behalf
of eligible program participants to address critical workforce shortages exacerbated by the
COVID-19 pandemic, including but not limited to the behavioral health and oral care
sectors. Under the program, the authority shall pay up to $25,000 per year and, in
aggregate, the lesser of $75,000 and 50% of the recipient’s outstanding student loan
balance.
2. Fund established. The Maine Health Care Provider Loan Repayment Fund is
established within the Finance Authority of Maine as a nonlapsing fund. The fund may
accept appropriations, donations and other funds from various sources, including state,
federal and private sources. Costs and expenses of maintaining, servicing and administering
the program may be paid out of the fund.
Page 1 - 132LR1298(03)

3. Rules. The Finance Authority of Maine may adopt routine technical rules pursuant
to Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A to carry out the purposes of the program, including
application requirements and program eligibility.
Page 2 - 132LR1298(03)